Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1672.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-L FIREFIGHTER AND EMERGENCYMEDICAL SERVICE PROVIDER RECRUITMENTAND RETENTION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L . Scope of article. This article relates to the Firefighter and Emergency Medical 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Service Provider Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit.Section 1902-L . Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active, paid or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical service provider." The term includes an active volunteer, as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 79A03 (relating to definitions) and a career first responder who volunteers or works for any of the following:(1) Career emergency medical services as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).(2) An emergency medical services company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(3) A fire company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(4) A volunteer emergency medical services company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(5) A volunteer fire company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802.(6) A volunteer rescue company as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Qualifying taxpayer." An individual who is an active, paid or volunteer firefighter or emergency medical service provider."Tax credit." The F irefighter and Emergency Medical Service Provider Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit authorized under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed on individuals under section 302."Taxpayer." A qualified individual subject to the tax 20250HB1672PN2041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 imposed under Article III.Section 1903-L . Credit for attraction and retention of needed professionals.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024 , a qualifying taxpayer may claim a tax credit, to be known as the Firefighter and Emergency Medical Service Provider Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit, not to exceed $2,500 against the qualifying taxpayer's tax liability for wages earned.(b) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer must claim a tax credit on a return filed under section 330.(c) Adequate proof of qualifications.--A taxpayer must provide the department with proof that the taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer.(d) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit shall be considered a payment of estimated tax made under Part VIII of Article III.(e) Duration of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim the tax credit for the year in which the taxpayer first becomes a qualified taxpayer and the next two succeeding tax years if the qualified taxpayer remains employed in a qualifying field . Section 1904-L . Prohibitions. A qualified taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, sell, assign or transfer a tax credit.Section 1905-L . Departmental duties. The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 1906-L . Applicability. The tax credit shall apply to individuals who become 20250HB1672PN2041 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualifying taxpayers after December 31, 2025 , and prior to January 1, 2029 . Section 1907-L . Expiration. The authority of the department to issue tax credits under this article shall expire December 31, 2031 . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1672PN2041 - 4 - 123456